Massachusetts, session 194th, S1442.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31A of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 4, the word “town;” and inserting in
place thereof the following words:- town. Said board of health may restrict the hours in which
business, residential, or commercial garbage, offal or other offensive substances may be
collected in areas zoned for residential or commercial use;
SECTION. 2 Section 31A of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, in line 6, the words “business, commercial or”.
of 1